Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-381
Manufacturer or dealer; branch offices;
separate registration; dealer's plates; use.

Whenever a manufacturer
or dealer licensed under the
Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act maintains a branch or subagency,
the manufacturer or dealer shall apply for a separate registration for such
branch or subagency and shall pay therefor the fees provided in section 60-3,114
for the registration of motor vehicles or trailers owned by or under the control
of the manufacturer or dealer, and the determination of the department upon
the question whether any establishment constitutes a branch or subagency,
within the intent of this section, shall be conclusive. No manufacturer, dealer,
or employee of a manufacturer or dealer shall cause or permit the display
or other use of any license plate or certificate of registration which has
been issued to such manufacturer or dealer except upon motor vehicles or trailers
owned by such manufacturer or dealer.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 81;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 10.

Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, see section 60-1401.